Washington statutes.
RCW 26.33.100

Petition for termination—Who may file—Contents—Time.

(1) A petition for termination of the parent-child relationship of a parent or *alleged father who has not executed a written consent to adoption may be filed by:

(a) The department or an agency;

(b) The prospective adoptive parent to whom a child has been or may be relinquished if the prospective adoptive parent has filed or consented to a petition for relinquishment; or

(c) The prospective adoptive parent if he or she seeks to adopt the child of his or her spouse.

(2) The petition for termination of the parent-child relationship shall contain a statement of facts identifying the petitioner, the parents, the legal guardian, a guardian ad litem for a party, any *alleged father, and the child. The petition shall state the facts forming the basis for the petition and shall be signed under penalty of perjury or be verified.

(3) The petition may be filed before the child's birth.

[ 1985 c 421 s 3; 1984 c 155 s 10.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 26.33.020 was amended by 2019 c 46 s 5034, changing the definition of "alleged father" to "alleged genetic parent."